Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 5. Regulation, Fees, Records, Reports, and Examinations.

Sec. 10.13.470.
Administration.

The department shall administer this chapter. The department may issue orders and may adopt regulations that, in the opinion of the department, are necessary to execute, enforce, and achieve the purposes of this chapter. Adoption of regulations under this chapter is subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.480.
Conditions of order or license.

When the department issues an order or license under this chapter, the department may impose conditions that the department determines are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.490.
Declaratory rulings.

The department may provide to an interested person a declaratory ruling on a provision of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.500.
Judicial review.

A final order, decision, license, or other official act of the department under this chapter is subject to judicial review by the superior court under the applicable rules of court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.510.
Investigations.

The department may make public or private investigations inside or outside the state that the department considers necessary to determine whether to approve an application for a license, to determine whether a person has violated or is about to violate this chapter, to aid in the enforcement of this chapter, or to aid in issuing an order or adopting a regulation under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.520.
Investigative powers.

For the purposes of an investigation, examination, or other proceeding under this chapter, the department may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel the attendance of witnesses, take evidence, and require the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, and other documents or records that the department considers relevant or material to the proceeding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.530.
Failure to comply or testify.

If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued by the department under this chapter or to testify with respect to a matter covered by this chapter, the superior court may issue an order requiring the attendance of the person and the giving of testimony or production of evidence.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.540.
Service of process.

If the department is authorized to make service of process in connection with a noncriminal administrative proceeding under this chapter, the department may make the service by registered or certified mail.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.550.
Fees.

A person shall pay the department

$2,500 for filing an application for a license;

$1,250 for filing an application for approval to acquire control of a licensee;

$1,250 for filing an application for approval for a merger, purchase, or sale under AS

10.13.430

—

10.13.460

; if two or more applications relating to the same merger, purchase, or sale are filed, the fee for filing each application is the figure resulting from dividing $1,250 by the number of the applications;

$2,500 each calendar year at the time established by the department, if the person is a licensee;

a fee established by the department for the examination of a licensee or a subsidiary of a licensee; the fee shall be paid within 30 days after receiving a statement from the department; a fee established under this paragraph must include

the proportionate part of the salaries and cost of employee benefits of the examiners while conducting the examination and while preparing the examination report; and

the transportation costs and per diem costs of each examiner while away from the examiner’s duty station.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.560.
Fee payment and refunds.

A fee for filing an application with the department shall be paid at the time the application is filed with the department and is not refundable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.570.
Records and report requirements.

A licensee shall make and keep books, accounts, and other records in the form and manner, at the place, and for the period of time that the department establishes.

A licensee, affiliate of a licensee, and a subsidiary of a licensee shall file with the department the reports that the department requires. A report must be in the form and contain the information that the department requires.

The department may require by order that a licensee include an asset on the licensee’s books and records at a valuation that represents the current value of the asset.

Not later than 90 days after the close of the calendar year, or a longer period if established by the department, a licensee shall file with the department an audit report containing

financial statements, including a balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in capital accounts, and statement of changes in financial position for, or as of the end of, the calendar year, prepared with an audit by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;

a report, certificate, or opinion of the independent certified public accountant who performs the audit, stating that the financial statements were prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; and

other information that the department may require.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.580.
Records kept by others.

If a person other than a licensee makes or keeps all or part of the books, accounts, or other records of the licensee, this chapter applies to the person with respect to the books, accounts, and other records to the same extent as if the person were the licensee.

If a person other than an affiliate or subsidiary of a licensee makes or keeps all or part of the books, accounts, or other records of the affiliate or subsidiary, this chapter applies to the person with respect to the books, accounts, and other records to the same extent as if the person were the affiliate or subsidiary.

If the department considers it expedient, the department may require a licensee to obtain the approval of the department before permitting another person to make or keep all or part of the books, accounts, or other records of the licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.590.
Information on economic development effect.

Each year the department shall publish and provide to the legislature information on the effect of this chapter on promoting economic development in the state. The information must include aggregate statistics on

the number and dollar amount of the financing assistance made by licensees to businesses; the amounts shall be organized into broad categories based on the types of industry involved; the standard industrial classification manual may be used for the categories;

the number and dollar amount of the financing assistance made by licensees to minority-owned businesses and to businesses owned by women; and

estimates of the number of jobs created or retained.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.600.
Examination of licensees and subsidiaries.

The department may at any time examine a licensee or a subsidiary of a licensee. Licensure under this chapter constitutes implied consent to examination by the department.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 26 SLA 2018.]

At the department’s request the following persons shall provide to the department the books, accounts, and records of a licensee or a licensee’s subsidiary and shall otherwise facilitate the department’s examination of the licensee to the fullest extent possible:

a director, officer, or employee of a licensee being examined by the department;

a director, officer, or employee of a subsidiary of a licensee being examined by the department;

a person having custody of the books, accounts, or records of a licensee being examined by the department;

a person having custody of the books, accounts, or records of a subsidiary of a licensee being examined by the department.

The department may retain a certified public accountant, attorney, appraiser, or other person to assist the department in the examination of a licensee or a subsidiary of a licensee if the department determines that the assistance is necessary. Within 10 days after receipt of a statement from the department, the licensee being examined shall pay the fees of a person retained by the department under this subsection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 26 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 13, 2018, repealed (b).